old/toy.foma
#!/usr/bin/env foma -f

read lexc toy.lexc

eliminate flag VALENCE
define LexiconNoFlags ;
define Lexicon LexiconNoFlags ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                       !!!
!!!      Phoneme/Grapheme Definition      !!!
!!!                                       !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define WordBoundary [ .#. ] ;
define MorphemeBoundary "^" ;


define Stop               [  p   |   t                 |  k     | "kw"   |  q    | "qw"       ] ;
define VoicedFricative    [  v   |   l  | z | y |  r   |  g     |  w     | "gh"  | "ghw"      ] ;
define VoicelessFricative [  f   | "ll" |   s   | "rr" | "gg"   | "wh"   | "ghh" | "ghhw" | h ] ;
define VoicedNasal        [  m   |   n                 | "ng"   | "ngw"                       ] ;
define VoicelessNasal     [ "mm" | "nn"                | "ngng" | "ngngw"                     ] ;

define Fricative  [ VoicelessFricative | VoicedFricative ] ;
define Nasal      [ VoicelessNasal     | VoicedNasal     ] ;

define C          [ Stop | Fricative | Nasal ] ;        

define FullVowel   [ a   | i   | u   ] ;
define DoubleVowel [ a a | i i | u u ] ;
define V           [ e | FullVowel ];

define Enclitic   [ ll u | ng u q ] ;

define Alphabet [ C | V | "*" | "'" ] ;
define MorphPhonSymbols [ "~"     | "~f"      | "~sf"   | "~h"    | "-w"    | ":"     | "–" |
                          "@*"    | "@₁"      | "@₂"    |
                          "(e)"   | "(g₁)"    | "(g₂)"  | "(g₃)"  | "(ng₁)" | "(ng₂)" | "(t)"   | "(te)"  | "(i₁)"  | "(i₂)" | "(u)" | "(a)" |
						  "(g/t)" | "(p/v)"   | "(s/z)" | "(t/y)" | "(i/u)" | "(i/e)" |    "(pete)fte"    |
                          "~f-w/-w" | "~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" | "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" | "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" | "@₁~flu/na" ] ;

define Lowercase "A" -> a ,
	             "I" -> i ,
				 "U" -> u ,
				 "E" -> e ,
				 "P" -> p ,
				 "T" -> t ,
				 "K" -> k ,
				 "Kw" -> kw ,
				 "Q" -> q ,
				 "Qw" -> qw,
				 "V" -> v ,
				 "L" -> l ,
				 "Z" -> z ,
                 "Y" -> y , 
                 "R" -> r ,
				 "G" -> g ,
				 "W" -> w ,
				 "Gh" -> gh ,
				 "Ghw" -> ghw ,
				 "F" -> f ,
				 "Ll" -> ll ,
				 "S" -> s ,
				 "Rr" -> rr ,
				 "Gg" -> gg ,
				 "Wh" -> wh ,
				 "Ghh" -> ghh ,
				 "Ghhw" -> ghhw ,
                 "M" -> m ,
				 "N" -> n ,
				 "Ng" -> ng ,
				 "Ngw" -> ngw ,
				 "Mm" -> mm ,
				 "Nn" -> nn ,
				 "Ngng" -> ngng ,
				 "Ngngw" -> ngngw ;

define InsertMorphBoundary [..] -> MorphemeBoundary || Alphabet _ MorphPhonSymbols ;

define CleanupMorphBoundary MorphemeBoundary -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* _ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                   !!!
!!!      Filters      !!!
!!!                   !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define LghiiFilter ~[ ?* "-" "@₁" "–" {l} "gh" {ii} ?* [ "[SgPosd]" | "[PlPosd]" | "[DuPosd]" ] ?* ]; 

define NeghMeghFilter ~[ [n | m] e "gh" ["-" "@₁" "ll" {eqe}                           |
                                         "-" "(te)" {ste}                              | 
                                         "-" "(te)" {sug}                              |
                                         "-" "@₁" "–" l "gh" {ii}                      |
                                         "-" "@₁" "–" "ng" {hite}                      |
                                         "-" "@*" "@₂" "~sf" "–" "(g₂)" {k} "(a)" {e}  |
                                         "[V]" "[Conc]" ] ?* ];

define NegheMegheFilter ~[ [n | m] {e} "gh" {e} ["-" "@₁" "~f" "–" {ragkii} "gh"  |
                                             "-" "@₁" "–" {ne} "gh"               |
                                             "[V]" "[Ctmp]"                       |
                                             "[V]" "[Ind]"                        |
                                             "[V]" "[Intrg]" ] ?* ];
						 
define NgughFilter ~[ ?* [Alphabet - "*"] "-" "@*" "ng" {u} "gh" ?* ];

define SfGKaKeFilter ~[ ?* "-" "@*" "@₂" "~sf" "–" "(g₂)" {k} "(a)" {e} ?* "[Unpd]" ?* ];

define UTaFilter ~[ ?* "~" ":" "(u)" {ta} ?* [ "[Sg]"      | "[Pl]"      | "[Du]"      |
                                               "[1SgPoss]" | "[1PlPoss]" | "[1DuPoss]" |
                                               "[2SgPoss]" | "[2PlPoss]" | "[2DuPoss]" ] ?* ];

define UTeFilter ~[ ?* "~" ":" "(u)" {te} ?* [ "[3Sg]"     | "[3Pl]"     | "[3Du]"     |
                                               "[3SgPoss]" | "[3PlPoss]" | "[3DuPoss]" ] ?* ];

define Filters [
	!LghiiFilter       ∘
    NeghMeghFilter    ∘
	NegheMegheFilter  ∘
	NgughFilter       
	!SfGKaKeFilter     ∘ 
	!UTaFilter         ∘
	!UTeFilter
];


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!      Morphophonological Rules      !!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

define SemiAndFinalE [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                     [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                     [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-hopping
                        e -> 0 ||                    V C _   MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! final e-dropping
                        e -> 0 ||    _   MorphemeBoundary  "~" (MorphPhonSymbols*) V ∘  ! final e-dropping  
                     [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                     [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                     [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! semi-final e-hopping
                        e -> 0 ||                    V C _ [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~"    ∘  ! semi-final e-dropping
                      "~" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary _                       ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~


define SemiFinalE [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf"  ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf"  ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf"  ∘  ! e-hopping
                     e -> 0 ||                    V C _ [g | gh ("*")] MorphemeBoundary "~sf"  ∘  ! e-dropping
                 "~sf" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary _          ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~sf 

define FinalE     [..] -> a || WordBoundary (C) a _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> i || WordBoundary (C) i _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                  [..] -> u || WordBoundary (C) u _ C e MorphemeBoundary "~f"     ∘  ! e-hopping
                     e -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* V C _ MorphemeBoundary "~f" ∘  ! e-dropping
                     e -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* _ MorphemeBoundary "~f" V   ∘  ! e-dropping
                  "~f" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary _          ;  ! finally remove intermediate symbol ~f

define NoHopNoDropE "~h" -> 0   || WordBoundary (C) DoubleVowel C e MorphemeBoundary _  ∘  ! does not drop e if e-hopping is not possible
                    "~h" -> 0   || V C V C e MorphemeBoundary _                         ∘  ! does not drop e if base contains multiple syllables
				    "~h" -> "~" || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary _            ;  ! otherwise drop e

define InterConsonantalE "(e)" -> e || C MorphemeBoundary (":") _  ∘  ! convert (e) to e when following a consonant
                         "(e)" -> 0 || V MorphemeBoundary (":") _  ;  ! otherwise delete it
						 
define WeakFinalC  gh   -> 0 || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ MorphemeBoundary [("~f") | ("~sf")] "-w"  ∘
                   "-w" -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*)  _               ;

define UnmarkStrongGh gh "*" -> gh || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphPhonSymbols* _ ;

define FinalConsonantDropAssimilation [ gh | g ] -> gh  || gh ("*") MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _   ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> g   || g  MorphemeBoundary       ("~f") "–" _   ∘
									  ! The line below is unfortunately required because of orthographic undoubling conventions
                                      [ gh | g ] -> wh  || w   MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  [ p | t | k | kw | q | qw | f | ll | s | wh ] ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> w   || w   MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _        ∘
                                      [ gh | g ] -> ghw || ghw MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _        ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> q   || [ q  | gh  ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _ \WordBoundary ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> qw  || [ qw | ghw ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> kw  || [ kw | w   ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                      [  q | k ] -> k   || [ k  | g   ] MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–" _  ∘
                                               C -> 0   ||  _ MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–"  ∘
									      gh "*" -> 0   ||  _ MorphemeBoundary ("~f") "–"  ∘
                                             "–" -> 0   ||  WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*) _  ;
